Georgia, session 2025_26, HB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
11 SECTION 1.
12 Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
13 is amended in Code Section 43-47-2, relating to definitions relative to used motor vehicle
14 and used motor vehicle parts dealers, by revising subparagraph (A) of paragraph (17) and
15 division (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (17) as follows:
H. B. 300
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0421
16 "(17)(A) 'Used motor vehicle dealer,' 'used car dealer,' or 'licensee' means any person
17 who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of
18 value, sells, exchanges, rents with option to purchase, offers, or attempts to negotiate
19 a sale or exchange of an interest in used motor vehicles or who is engaged wholly or
20 in part in the business of selling used motor vehicles, whether or not such motor
21 vehicles are owned by such person. A motor vehicle wholesaler and a motor vehicle
22 broker shall be deemed to be a used motor vehicle dealer or a used car dealer for the
23 purposes of this chapter. Any independent motor vehicle leasing agency which sells
24 or offers for sale used motor vehicles shall be deemed to be a used motor vehicle dealer
25 or a used car dealer for the purposes of this chapter. Any motor vehicle auction
26 company selling or offering for sale used motor vehicles to independent motor vehicle
27 dealers or to individual consumers shall be deemed to be a used motor vehicle dealer
28 or used car dealer for the purposes of this chapter except as otherwise provided in
29 division (x) of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph. Without limiting any of the
30 foregoing, the sale of five or more used motor vehicles in any one calendar year shall
31 be prima-facie evidence that a person is engaged in the business of selling used motor
32 vehicles. A pawnbroker who disposes of all repossessed motor vehicles by selling or
33 exchanging his or her interest in such motor vehicles only to licensees under this
34 chapter shall not be considered a used motor vehicle dealer under this chapter as long
35 as such pawnbroker does not otherwise engage in activities which would bring him or
36 her under the licensing requirements of this chapter."
37 "(v) Financial institutions when the financial institution sells its repossessed or leased
38 motor vehicles. Finance companies, for purposes of this chapter, shall not include a
39 pawnbroker as defined in Code Section 44-12-130;"
H. B. 300
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0421
40 SECTION 2.
41 Said title is further amended in Code Section 43-47-3, relating to the State Board of
42 Registration of Used Motor Vehicle Dealers and Used Motor Vehicle Parts Dealers, by
43 revising paragraph (9) of subsection (a) as follows:
44 "(9) One member shall be a pawnbroker as defined in Code Section 44-12-130 who is
45 in the business of pawning automobile titles motor vehicles and is licensed as a used car
46 dealer; and"
47 SECTION 3.
48 Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to property, is amended in Code
49 Section 44-12-130, relating to definitions relative to pawnbrokers, by revising paragraph (5)
50 as follows:
51 "(5) 'Pledged goods' means tangible personal property, including, without limitation, all
52 types of motor vehicles or any motor vehicle certificate of title, which property is
53 purchased by, deposited with, or otherwise actually delivered into the possession of a
54 pawnbroker in connection with a pawn transaction. However, for purposes of this Code
55 section, possession of any motor vehicle certificate of title which has come into the
56 possession of a pawnbroker through a pawn transaction made in accordance with law
57 shall be conclusively deemed to be possession of the motor vehicle, and the pawnbroker
58 shall retain physical possession of the motor vehicle certificate of title for the entire
59 length of the pawn transaction but shall not be required in any way to retain physical
60 possession of the motor vehicle at any time. 'Pledged goods' Such term shall not include
61 choses in action, securities, or printed evidences of indebtedness, or any motor vehicle
62 certificate of title."
H. B. 300
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0421
63 SECTION 4.
64 Said title is further amended in Code Section 44-12-131, relating to duration of pawn
65 transactions, lease-back of motor vehicles prohibited, taking possession of motor vehicles,
66 restrictions on interest, fees, or charges, action to recover excessive or undisclosed charges,
67 and consequences of excessive charges, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
68 "(a)(1) All pawn transactions shall be for 30 day periods but may be extended or
69 continued for additional 30 day periods.
70 (2) A pawnbroker shall not lease back to the seller or pledgor any motor vehicle during
71 a pawn transaction or during any extension or continuation of the pawn transaction.
72 (3) Unless otherwise agreed, a pawnbroker has upon default the right to take possession
73 of the motor vehicle. In taking possession, the pawnbroker or his agent may proceed
74 without judicial process if this can be done without breach of the peace or may proceed
75 by action Reserved.
76 (4)(A) During the first 90 days of any pawn transaction or extension or continuation
77 of the pawn transaction, a pawnbroker may charge for each 30 day period interest and
78 pawnshop charges which together equal no more than 25 percent of the principal
79 amount advanced, with a minimum charge of up to $10.00 per 30 day period.
80 (B) On any pawn transaction which is continued or extended beyond 90 days, a
81 pawnbroker may charge for each 30 day period interest and pawnshop charges which
82 together equal no more than 12.5 percent of the principal amount advanced, with a
83 minimum charge of up to $5.00 per 30 day period.
84 (C) In addition to the charges provided for in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this
85 paragraph, in a pawn transaction or in any extension or continuation of a pawn
86 transaction involving a motor vehicle or a motor vehicle certificate of title, a
87 pawnbroker may charge the following:
H. B. 300
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0421
88 (i) A fee equal to no more than any fee imposed by the appropriate state to register
89 a lien upon a motor vehicle title, but only if the pawnbroker actually registers such a
90 lien;
91 (ii) No more than $5.00 per day in storage fees, but only if an actual repossession
92 pursuant to a default takes place on a vehicle which was not already in the
93 pawnbroker's possession and only for each day the pawnbroker must actually retain
94 possession of the motor vehicle; and
95 (iii) A repossession fee of $50.00 within 50 miles of the office where the pawn
96 originated, $100.00 within 51 to 100 miles, $150.00 within 101 to 300 miles and a fee
97 of $250.00 beyond 300 miles, but only if an actual repossession pursuant to a default
98 takes place on a vehicle which was not already in the pawnbroker's possession
99 Reserved.
100 (D) If a pledgor or seller requests that the pawnbroker mail or ship the pledged item
101 to the pledgor or seller, a pawnbroker may charge a fee for the actual shipping and
102 mailing costs, plus a handling fee equal to not more than 50 percent of the actual
103 shipping and mailing costs.
104 (E) In the event the pledgor or seller has lost or destroyed the original pawn ticket, a
105 pawnbroker may, at the time of redemption, charge a fee equal to not more than $2.00.
106 (5) No other charge or fee of any kind by whatever name denominated, including but not
107 limited to any other storage fee for a motor vehicle, shall be made by a pawnbroker
108 except as set out in paragraph (4) of this subsection.
109 (6) No fee or charge provided for in this Code section may be imposed unless a
110 disclosure regarding that fee or charge has been properly made as provided for in Code
111 Section 44-12-138.
112 (7)(A) Any interest, fees, or charges collected which are undisclosed, improperly
113 disclosed, or in excess of that allowed by this subsection may be recovered by the
114 pledgor or seller in an action at law in any superior court of appropriate jurisdiction.
H. B. 300
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0421
115 (B) In any such action in which the pledgor or seller prevails, the court shall also award
116 reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs, and any expenses of litigation to the pledgor or
117 seller.
118 (C) Before filing an action under this Code section, the pledgor or seller shall provide
119 the pawnbroker with a written notice by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery,
120 return receipt requested, that such an action is contemplated, identifying any fees or
121 charges which the pledgor or seller contends are undisclosed, improperly disclosed, or
122 in excess of the fees and charges allowed by this Code section. If the court finds that
123 during the 30 days following receipt of this notice the pawnbroker made a good faith
124 offer to return any excess, undisclosed, or improperly disclosed charges, the court shall
125 award reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs, and expenses of litigation to the
126 pawnbroker.
127 (D) No action shall be brought under this Code section more than two years after the
128 pledgor or seller knew or should have known of the excess, undisclosed, or improperly
129 disclosed charges."
130 SECTION 5.
131 Said title is further amended in Code Section 44-12-138, relating to restrictions on
132 advertising and disclosure tickets or statements, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
133 "(b) Every pawnbroker in every pawn transaction shall present the pledgor or seller with
134 a written disclosure ticket or statement in at least nine-point type, appropriately completed,
135 with no other written or pictorial matter except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code
136 section, containing the following information:
137 (1) Information identifying the pawnbroker by name and address;
138 (2) A statement as follows:
H. B. 300
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0421
139 'This is a pawn transaction. Failure to make your payments as described in this
140 document can result in the loss of the pawned item. The pawnbroker can sell or keep
141 the item if you have not made all payments by the specified maturity date.';
142 (3) If the pawned item is a motor vehicle or motor vehicle certificate of title, a statement
143 as follows:
144 'Failure to make your payment as described in this document can result in the loss of
145 your motor vehicle. The pawnbroker can also charge you certain fees if he or she
146 actually repossesses the motor vehicle.';
147 (4) A statement that the length of the pawn transaction is 30 days and that it can only be
148 renewed with the agreement of both parties and only for 30 day incremental periods;
149 (5) The annual percentage rate, computed in accordance with the federal Truth in
150 Lending Act and regulations under the federal Truth in Lending Act, for the first 30 days
151 of the transaction, computed as if all interest and pawnshop charges were considered to
152 be interest;
153 (6) The annual percentage rate, computed in accordance with the federal Truth in
154 Lending Act and regulations under the federal Truth in Lending Act, for each 30 day
155 period in which the pawn transaction might be continued or extended, computed as if all
156 interest and pawnshop charges were considered to be interest. For purposes of
157 identifying the annual percentage rate after the second continuation or extension, a single
158 statement which identifies an annual percentage rate for each possible 30 day period
159 thereafter shall meet the requirements of this Code section;
160 (7) A statement in dollar amounts of how much it will cost the seller or pledgor to
161 redeem the merchandise in the first 30 day period of the transaction;
162 (8) A statement in dollar amounts of how much it will cost the seller or pledgor to
163 redeem the merchandise in any 30 day period after the first 30 day period of the pawn
164 transaction, provided that all fees and charges have been kept current;
165 (9) A statement of the specific maturity date of the pawn transaction;
H. B. 300
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0421
166 (10) A statement of how long, the grace period, the pledged goods may be redeemed
167 after the specific maturity date and the dollar amount which will be required to redeem
168 the pledged goods after the specific maturity date;
169 (11) A statement that after the grace period the pledged goods become the property of
170 the pawnbroker;
171 (12) If the pawn transaction involves a motor vehicle or motor vehicle certificate of title,
172 a statement that the pawnbroker may not charge a storage fee for the motor vehicle unless
173 the pawnbroker repossesses the motor vehicle pursuant to a default;
174 (13) If the pawn transaction involves a motor vehicle or motor vehicle certificate of title,
175 a statement that the pawnbroker may charge a storage fee for a repossessed motor vehicle
176 not to exceed $5.00 per day, but only if the pawnbroker actually repossesses and actually
177 must store the motor vehicle Reserved;
178 (14) If the pawn transaction involves a motor vehicle or motor vehicle certificate of title,
179 a statement that the pawnbroker may charge a repossession fee, not to exceed $50.00, but
180 only if the pawnbroker actually repossesses the motor vehicle Reserved;
181 (15) If the pawn transaction involves a motor vehicle or motor vehicle certificate of title,
182 a statement that the pawnbroker may charge a fee to register a lien upon the motor vehicle
183 certificate of title, not to exceed any fee actually charged by the appropriate state to
184 register a lien upon a motor vehicle certificate of title, but only if the pawnbroker actually
185 places such a lien upon the motor vehicle certificate of title Reserved;
186 (16) A statement that any costs to ship the pledged items to the pledgor or seller can be
187 charged to the pledgor or seller, along with a handling fee to equal no more than 50
188 percent of the actual costs to ship the pledged items; and
189 (17) A statement that a fee of up to $2.00 can be charged for each lost or destroyed pawn
190 ticket."
H. B. 300
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0421
191 SECTION 6.
192 Said title is further amended in Code Section 44-14-403, relating to lien of pawnbroker,
193 action for interference, grace period on pawn transactions, extension or continuation of
194 maturity date, and redemption of goods after maturity date, by revising paragraphs (1) and
195 (4) of subsection (b) as follows:
196 "(b)(1) There shall be a grace period on all pawn transactions. On pawn transactions
197 involving motor vehicles or motor vehicle certificates of title, the grace period shall be
198 30 calendar days; on all other pawn transactions the grace period shall be ten calendar
199 days. In the event that the last day of the grace period falls on a day in which the
200 pawnbroker is not open for business, the grace period shall be extended through the first
201 day following upon which the pawnbroker is open for business. The pawnbroker shall
202 not sell the pledged goods during the grace period."
203 "(4) Any attempt to circumvent the interest rates and charges as specified in Code
204 Section 44-12-131 shall be null and void. A pawn transaction shall be considered to have
205 been extended or continued unless:
206 (A) All charges, fees, and the principal have actually been paid or repaid on the
207 previous pawn transaction;
208 (B) The pledged goods in the previous transaction, including but not limited to a motor
209 vehicle certificate of title, have actually been restored to the possession of the pledgor
210 or seller; and
211 (C) The pledged goods in the previous transaction have been removed from the
212 business premises of the pawnbroker and, in the case of a motor vehicle certificate of
213 title, any lien on the motor vehicle certificate of title has been removed or released."
214 SECTION 7.
215 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 300
- 9 -